Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 24

Tennessee Community Gardening Act

43-24-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Community Gardening Act.”

Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 24, §§ 43-24-101 — 43-24-109 (Acts 1977, ch. 409, §§ 1-8; T.C.A., §§ 43-3101—43-3108; Acts 2009, ch. 66, § 2; 2011, ch. 330, §§ 1-10; 2013, ch. 3, § 1), concerning community gardening was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 1, effective March 21, 2014.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 7. March 21, 2014.

43-24-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Community garden” means a piece of real property, either on vacant public land or on private land, cultivated by residents of a neighborhood or community, or members of a homeowners or condominium owners association for the purpose of providing the following for the use of residents of the neighborhood or community, or members of the homeowners or condominium owners association:

Vegetables, nuts, herbs, fruit, or flowers, whether by means of cultivating annual, biennial or perennial plants, or trees; and

Honey and honey byproducts, through the placement and use of beehives;

“Grand-mentoring” means collaborative projects between persons sixty (60) years of age or older and students in kindergarten through twelfth (K-12) grade;

“Local government” means any municipality, county or metropolitan government;

“Use” means, when applied to gardening and beekeeping, to make use of, without conveyance of title or any other ownership; and

“Vacant public land” means any land owned by a local government that is not in use for public purposes.

Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 1; 2017, ch. 35, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 24, §§ 43-24-101 — 43-24-109 (Acts 1977, ch. 409, §§ 1-8; T.C.A., §§ 43-3101—43-3108; Acts 2009, ch. 66, § 2; 2011, ch. 330, §§ 1-10; 2013, ch. 3, § 1), concerning community gardening was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 1, effective March 21, 2014.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the purpose of providing the following for the use of residents” for “the purpose of providing vegetables, nuts, herbs, fruit or flowers, whether by means of cultivating annual, biennial or perennial plants, or trees, for use of residents” in the present introductory phrase, and added (A) and (B) in the definition of “community garden”; and inserted “and beekeeping” in the definition of “use”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 7. March 21, 2014.

Acts 2017, ch. 35, § 4. March 30, 2017.

43-24-103. Legislative intent — Local governments authorized to establish community gardening programs — Use of vacant public land — Use of private property — Priority in allotment of public land — Private property exempt from certain requirements.

It is the intent of this chapter to create authority for local governments to promote healthy eating and active living in their community by encouraging and supporting community gardens. In furtherance of this intent, local governments are authorized to establish community gardening programs.

Any local government may allow and encourage the use of vacant public land for community gardening under terms and conditions established by ordinance in the case of municipalities and metropolitan governments and resolution in the case of counties. These local regulations may include, in addition to other requirements:

A requirement for a permit for which a reasonable permit fee may be charged;

A requirement that the permittee provide security in the form of a refundable deposit or otherwise for proper clean-up of the community garden after harvest is completed;

A requirement that the permittee possess liability insurance and accept liability for any injury or damage resulting from use of vacant public land for community gardening; and

A requirement that the permittee indemnify and save harmless the local government and its officers, agents and employees against suits and claims of liability arising out of, or in consequence of, the use of vacant public land.

Any local government may establish a program, with the cooperation and assistance of the county agricultural extension agent, for the ready identification of vacant public land available for community gardening.

Any local government may assist in the development of community gardens on vacant public land or on private property by expending funds and providing use of materials and equipment for these purposes, and these expenditures and uses shall be considered a valid public purpose.

Any owner of private land, including, but not limited to, individuals, corporations, partnerships, sole proprietorships, homeowner associations, condominium associations and other private property owners may make available to the local government parcels of land for community gardening under terms and conditions agreed upon between the local government and the owner.

If there is a shortage of parcels or space for community gardening, first priority in the allotment of public land should be given to grand-mentoring and second priority in the allotment of public land should be given to persons sixty (60) years of age or older and persons whose gross annual income is equal to or less than the poverty guidelines published annually in the Federal Register by the United States department of health and human services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. § 9909(2).

Community gardens located on private property and operated without the intervention of a local government are not subject to the permitting, security, insurance and indemnification requirements authorized in subdivision (a)(1)(B), but these and other provisions may be agreed upon by the parties. Community gardens located on private property shall comply with applicable state and local regulations relative to nuisances, property maintenance and the health, safety and welfare of the public.

Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 24, §§ 43-24-101 — 43-24-109 (Acts 1977, ch. 409, §§ 1-8; T.C.A., §§ 43-3101—43-3108; Acts 2009, ch. 66, § 2; 2011, ch. 330, §§ 1-10; 2013, ch. 3, § 1), concerning community gardening was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 1, effective March 21, 2014.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 7. March 21, 2014.

43-24-104. Chapter to be liberally construed — Property owners urged to expedite use of vacant or unused property for community gardening.

It is the policy of the state to encourage community gardening on both public and private property, and to that end this chapter shall be liberally construed. Local governments, homeowner or condominium associations, neighborhood or community associations, and private property owners are urged to expedite the use of vacant or unused real property under their control for community gardening to the furthest extent practicable.

Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 24, §§ 43-24-101 — 43-24-109 (Acts 1977, ch. 409, §§ 1-8; T.C.A., §§ 43-3101—43-3108; Acts 2009, ch. 66, § 2; 2011, ch. 330, §§ 1-10; 2013, ch. 3, § 1), concerning community gardening was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 1, effective March 21, 2014.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 556, § 7. March 21, 2014.

43-24-105. Registration as beekeeper.

Any person, including, but not limited to, a grand mentor, who provides honey or honey byproducts through the placement and use of beehives under this chapter shall first be registered as a beekeeper pursuant to the Tennessee Apiary Act of 1995, compiled in title 44, chapter 15, and shall be subject to all provisions of such act.

Acts 2017, ch. 35, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 35, § 4. March 30, 2017.